cs: Elektronika > Elektronika – příslušenství > Počítačové komponenty > Paměťová zařízení > Duplikátory disků: Duplikátory disků CD/DVD/Blu-ray; Duplikátory pevných disků; Duplikátory paměťových karet; Duplikátory jednotek USB
fi: Elektroniikka > Sähkötarvikkeet > Tietokonekomponentit > Tallennuslaitteet > Levyjen monistuslaitteet: CD-/DVD-/Blu-ray-monistuslaitteet; Kovalevyn monistuslaitteet; Muistikortin kopioija; USB-muistin monistaja
sl-SI: Elektronika > Elektronski dodatki > Računalniške komponente > Pomnilniške naprave > Razmnoževalniki diskov: Razmnoževalniki CD/DVD/Blu-ray; Razmnoževalniki trdih diskov; Podvajalniki pomnilniških kartic; Razmnoževalniki USB pogonov
it: Elettronica > Accessori dispositivi elettronici > Componenti per computer > Dispositivi archiviazione > Duplicatori di dischi: Duplicatori CD/DVD/Blu-ray; Duplicatori disco rigido; Duplicatori di schede di memoria; Duplicatori unità USB
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > Phụ kiện thiết bị điện tử > Linh kiện máy tính > Thiết bị lưu trữ > Bộ sao chép đĩa: Bộ sao chép CD/DVD/Blu-ray; Bộ sao chép ổ cứng; Máy sao chép thẻ bộ nhớ; Thiết bị sao chép ổ USB
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 电子配件 > 计算机组件 > 存储设备 > 磁盘拷贝机: CD/DVD/蓝光复印机; 硬盘复制器; 存储卡复制器; U 盘拷贝机
de: Elektronik > Elektronisches Zubehör > Computerkomponenten > Speichergeräte > Datenspeicher-Duplizierer: CD/DVD/Blu-ray-Duplizierer; Festplatten-Duplizierer; Speicherkarten-Duplizierer; USB-Laufwerk-Duplizierer
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Acessórios para eletrônicos > Componentes para computador > Dispositivos de armazenamento > Duplicadores de disco: Duplicadores de CD/DVD/Blu-ray; Duplicadores de disco rígido; Duplicadores de cartão de memória; Duplicadores de unidades USB
es: Electrónica > Accesorios electrónicos > Componentes para computadoras > Dispositivos de almacenamiento > Duplicadoras de disco: Duplicadoras de CD/DVD/Blu-ray; Duplicadoras de disco duro; Duplicadores de tarjeta de memoria; Duplicadoras de unidades USB
bg-BG: Електроника > Аксесоари за електроника > Компютърни компоненти > Устройства за съхранение > Дубликатори на дискове: CD/DVD/Blu-ray дубликатори; Дубликатори на твърди дискове; Дубликатори за карта с памет; Дубликатори на USB устройства
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Acessórios eletrónicos > Componentes informáticos > Dispositivos de armazenamento > Duplicadores de disco: Duplicadores de CD/DVD/Blu-ray; Duplicadores de disco rígido; Duplicadores de cartões de memória; Duplicadores de USB
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 電子配件 > 電腦元件 > 儲存裝置 > 磁碟拷貝機: CD/DVD/藍光拷貝機; 硬碟拷貝機; 記憶卡複製機; 隨身碟對拷機
fr: Appareil électronique > Accessoires électroniques > Composants d’ordinateur > Périphériques de stockage > Duplicateurs de disques: Duplicateurs de CD/DVD/Blu-ray; Duplicateurs de disque dur; Duplicateurs de cartes mémoire; Duplicateurs de clés USB
nb: Elektronikk > Elektronikktilbehør > Datamaskinkomponenter > Oppbevaringsutstyr > Diskduplikatorer: CD/DVD/Blu-ray-duplikatorer; Harddisk-duplikatorer; Minnekortduplikatorer; USB-diskduplikatorer
ru: Электроника > Аксессуары для электроники > Компьютерные компоненты > Запоминающие устройства > Дубликаторы дисков: Дубликаторы дисков CD, DVD и Blu-ray; Дубликаторы жестких дисков; Дупликаторы карт памяти; Дубликаторы USB-накопителей
ko: 전자기기 > 전자기기 부대용품 > 컴퓨터 구성품 > 스토리지 장치 > 디스크 복제기: CD/DVD/블루레이 복제기; 하드 드라이브 복제기; 메모리 카드 복제기; USB 드라이브 복제기
hr-HR: Elektronika > Pribor za elektroniku > Računalne komponente > Uređaji za pohranu podataka > Uređaj za dupliciranje diskova: CD/DVD/Blu-ray uređaji za dupliciranje; Dupliciranje tvrdog diska; Duplikatori memorijske kartice; Dupliciranje USB-a
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Αξεσουάρ ηλεκτρονικών συσκευών > Εξαρτήματα υπολογιστή > Συσκευές αποθήκευσης > Διατάξεις αντιγραφής δίσκων: Διατάξεις αντιγραφής CD/DVD/Blu-ray; Διατάξεις αντιγραφής σκληρών δίσκων; Διπλοποιητές καρτών μνήμης; Διατάξεις αντιγραφής μονάδων USB
nl: Elektronica > Accessoires voor elektronica > Computeronderdelen > Opslagapparaten > Schijfduplicators: Cd-/dvd-/blu-ray-duplicators; Vasteschijfduplicators; Geheugenkaart duplicators; USB-stationduplicators
da: Elektronik > Elektronik – tilbehør > Computerkomponenter > Lagringsenheder > Diskduplikatorer: CD/DVD/Blu-ray-duplikatorer; Harddiskduplikatorer; Hukommelseskort-duplikatorer; USB-drevduplikatorer
hu: Elektronika > Elektronikai kiegészítők > Számítógép-komponensek > Tárolóeszközök > Lemezmásolók: CD/DVD/Blu-ray-másolók; Merevlemez-másolók; Memóriakártya-másolók; USB meghajtó-másolók
ro-RO: Electronice > Accesorii electronice > Componente calculatoare > Dispozitive de stocare > Dispozitive de copiere discuri: Dispozitive de copiere CD/DVD/Blu-ray; Dispozitive de copiere hard disk; Duplicatoare de carduri de memorie; Dispozitive de copiere unitate USB
tr: Elektronik > Elektronik Alet Aksesuarları > Bilgisayar Bileşenleri > Depolama Aygıtları > Disk Çoğaltıcılar: CD/DVD/Blu-ray Çoğaltıcılar; Sabit Sürücü Çoğaltıcılar; Bellek Kartı Çoğaltıcıları; USB Sürücü Çoğaltıcılar
sk-SK: Elektronika > Elektronické príslušenstvo > Počítačové komponenty > Úložné zariadenia > Duplikátory diskov: CD/DVD/Blu-ray duplikátory; Duplikátory pevných diskov; Duplikátory pamäťových kariet; Duplikátory USB diskov
sv: Elektronik > Elektroniktillbehör > Datorkomponenter > Lagringsenheter > Diskduplicerare: CD/DVD/Blu-ray duplikatorer; Hårddiskduplicerare; Minneskortduplikatorer; Duplicerare för USB-enheter
pl: Elektronika > Akcesoria elektroniczne > Elementy komputera > Pamięci komputerowe > Duplikatory dysków: Duplikatory CD/DVD/Blu-ray; Duplikatory dysków twardych; Powielacze kart pamięci; Duplikatory dysków USB
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > อุปกรณ์อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > ส่วนประกอบคอมพิวเตอร์ > อุปกรณ์จัดเก็บข้อมูล > เครื่องทำสำเนาดิสก์: เครื่องทำสำเนาซีดี/ดีวีดี/บลูเรย์; เครื่องทำสำเนาฮาร์ดไดรฟ์; เครื่องทำสำเนาการ์ดความจำ; เครื่องคัดลอก USB ไดรฟ์
lt-LT: Elektronika > Elektronikos priedai > Kompiuterių komponentai > Laikmenos įrenginiai > Disko kopijavimo įrenginiai: CD / DVD / „Blu-ray“ kopijavimo įrenginiai; Standžiųjų diskų kopijavimo įrenginiai; Atminties kortelių kopijavimo įrenginiai; USB laikmenų kopijavimo įrenginiai
en: Electronics > Electronics Accessories > Computer Components > Storage Devices > Disk Duplicators: CD/DVD/Blu-ray Duplicators; Hard Drive Duplicators; Memory Card Duplicators; USB Drive Duplicators
ja: 電子機器 > 電気製品関連用品・PC周辺機器 > PC部品・周辺機器 > ストレージデバイス > ディスクデュプリケーター: CD/DVD/Blu-rayデュプリケーター; HDDデュプリケーター; メモリーカード複製機; USBドライブデュプリケーター